Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.465

Crop purchase contracts for dedicated energy crops.

In addition to any other authority provided by law, public development authorities are authorized to enter into crop purchase contracts for a dedicated energy crop for the purposes of producing, selling, and distributing biodiesel produced from Washington state feedstocks, cellulosic ethanol, and cellulosic ethanol blend fuels.

[ 2007 c 348 s 208.]

NOTES:

Findings—2007 c 348: See RCW 43.325.005.